District of Columbia statutes.
31-2996.03

Limitations on other coverage.

This chapter shall not limit or alter any right to dependent coverage or to the continuation of coverage that is otherwise provided for in the District of Columbia.

Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-252, § 4, 57 DCR 8064

History

Section 4 of D.C. Law 18-203 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 4. Limitations on other coverage. ”This act shall not limit or alter any right to dependent coverage or to the continuation of coverage that is otherwise provided for in the District of Columbia.”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 18-203 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Health Insurance for Dependents Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-384, April 29, 2010, 57 DCR 3835).

Emergency Legislation